California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) For purposes of this section and Section 99314.3, “qualifying revenue” means fare revenues, including fares generated for community transit services under contract with the STA-eligible operator, and any other funds used by the operator in the delivery of transit service, except federal and state funds. The revenue amount for each STA-eligible operator shall be determined from the annual report submitted to the Controller pursuant to Section 99243. Revenue used for capital expenditures or depreciation shall not constitute qualifying revenue. The revenue share for the Altamont Corridor Express and the Southern California Regional Rail Authority shall be determined by the qualifying revenues reported to the Controller in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 99314.1 and subdivision (b) of Section 99314.2, respectively.

(c) An STA-eligible operator qualifies to receive STA funding pursuant to this section beginning on the date when it commences revenue passenger service. A new STA-eligible operator shall notify the Controller in writing that it has commenced revenue passenger service within 10 business days of beginning the service. A new STA-eligible operator that commences revenue passenger service before August 1 of a fiscal year shall be eligible to receive funds in that fiscal year based on the qualifying revenue reported to the Controller two years before that fiscal year, consistent with subdivision (e). If a new STA-eligible operator commences revenue passenger service on or after August 1 of a fiscal year, the Controller shall calculate the operator’s pro rata share of STA funds under this section for that fiscal year based on the date the operator commenced revenue passenger service. That amount shall be added as an adjustment to an operator’s STA
 funding for the subsequent fiscal year, and the adjustment shall be drawn as an off-the-top reduction from the first quarter of STA funds under this section.

(d) The Controller shall determine allocation amounts pursuant to this section based on the qualifying revenue reported two years before the fiscal year in which the funds are allocated.

(e) Qualifying revenue for a given fiscal year shall not exceed an STA-eligible operator’s annual operating expenses, as reported to the Controller. Operating expenses include, but are not limited to, the direct cost of operating transit service, payments by the STA-eligible operator for community transit service provided by entities that are not eligible to receive funds directly pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99314.3, administrative costs, and routine maintenance. Operating expenses do not include transfers from an operating budget
 to a capital account.

(f) For the purpose of allocating funds pursuant to this section, Section 99314.1, and 99314.2, “STA-eligible operator” includes the Altamont Corridor Express and the Southern California Regional Rail Authority. The revenue share for these operators shall be based on the qualifying revenue used to operate the systems consistent with subdivision (b), including fares and the amounts contributed by the parties to the cooperative service agreement in the case of the Altamont Corridor Express, and by the member agencies in the case of the Southern California Regional Rail Authority.

(g) Funds allocated by the Controller to a transportation planning agency or county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to this section shall be allocated by the agency, commission, or board to STA-eligible operators pursuant to
 Section 99314.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 177.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) The “Altamont Corridor Express” or the “authority” is the joint powers agency duly formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by and between the Alameda Congestion Management Agency, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, and the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission. Any reference to the “Altamont Corridor Express” or the “authority” shall be construed to include a reference to any entity that is a successor to the authority.

(2) “Qualifying revenue” means qualifying revenue, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 99314, that
 is derived from operating as a member agency of the authority.

(b) The authority shall report to the Controller, for each fiscal year, the ratio that the qualifying revenue of each member agency of the authority bears to the total qualifying revenue of the authority during that fiscal year. The authority shall provide the ratios within the timeframe specified by subdivision (a) of Section 99243.

(c) (1) From funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99312 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1, the Controller shall allocate to the transportation planning agencies in the jurisdictions of the parties to the cooperative service agreement an amount for each member agency of the authority that is based on the ratio provided under subdivision (b), for allocation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99314.3.

(2) The allocation set forth in paragraph (1) shall be in addition to any other allocation provided under this article.

(3) Allocations made under this section shall be used only for STA program purposes authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 178.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) The “Southern California Regional Rail Authority” or the “authority” is that joint powers authority described in Section 14072 of the Government Code and includes any additional agencies that may join the authority under Section 14072.2 of that code.

(2) “Qualifying revenue” means qualifying revenue, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 99314, that is derived from operating as a member agency of the authority.

(b) The Southern California Regional Rail Authority shall report to the Controller, for each fiscal year, the ratio that the qualifying
 revenue of each member agency of the authority bears to the total qualifying revenue of the authority during that fiscal year. The authority shall provide the ratios within the timeframe specified by subdivision (a) of Section 99243.

(c) (1) From funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99312 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 99312.1, the Controller shall allocate to the county transportation commissions in the jurisdictions of the member agency’s area an amount for each member agency of the authority that is based on the ratio provided under subdivision (b), for allocation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99314.3.

(2) The allocation set forth in paragraph (1) shall be in addition to any other allocation provided under this article.

(3) Allocations made
 under this section shall be used only for STA program purposes authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 179.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.3.

(a) The amount allocated to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board pursuant to Section 99314 shall be allocated by those entities to the STA-eligible operators in the area of their respective jurisdictions.

(b) The amount allocated by a transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the board to each STA-eligible operator pursuant to Section 99314 shall be based on the ratio that the operator’s qualifying revenue bears to the total qualifying revenue of all STA-eligible operators within the area of jurisdiction of the transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or board. The Controller
 shall publish the share of funds corresponding to each STA-eligible operator as well as the total amount to be allocated to each transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or board.

(c) The amount allocated by the Controller to a transportation planning agency corresponding to the parties to the cooperative service agreement of the Altamont Corridor Express and the member agencies of the Southern California Regional Rail Authority, pursuant to Section 99314, shall be allocated by the transportation planning agency in the jurisdiction of the parties to the cooperative services agreement or the member agency’s area for STA program purposes authorized in this chapter. The allocation shall be based on the ratio that the qualifying revenues bear to the qualifying revenue of all STA-eligible operators.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the City and County of
 San Francisco with respect to its municipal railway system, the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District, and the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District shall be considered one operator. The amount allocated to them as one operator shall be apportioned to each of them based on the ratio of its revenue to the sum of their revenues, excluding from the determination of that ratio the amount allocated to each of them pursuant to Section 29142.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 15.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.4.

(a) An operator in an urbanized area having a population of less than 200,000 persons may elect to participate in the funding exchange program authorized by this subdivision. An operator electing to participate in the funding exchange program shall give notice to the director and shall indicate the amount of funds which it wants allocated for the funding exchange program.

From funds that would otherwise be allocated to an operator under the State Transit Assistance Program, an amount so designated by the participating operator shall be allocated to the department for transfer pursuant to an agreement between the department and the State of Arizona whereby California can receive federal mass transportation funds originally apportioned to the
 State of Arizona.

The department shall allocate the federal mass transportation funds so received to each participating operator in the same proportion as the operator contributed to the funding exchange program. Funds so received shall be used only for the purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program and are subject to all statutes and rules and regulations applicable to funds allocated pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314.

The Legislature finds and declares that the exchange of state funds for federal mass transportation funds authorized by this section will result in a net increase in the total amount of funds to be available to the participating operators.

(b) A transportation planning agency or county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board may authorize an STA-eligible operator under its jurisdiction to
 exchange funds allocated to it pursuant to Section 99314 for funds made available pursuant to Section 99231. Any funds allocated pursuant to Section 99314 that are exchanged pursuant to this section shall only be available to other STA-eligible operators and shall be used for STA program purposes authorized by this chapter and are subject to all statutes and rules and regulations applicable to funds allocated pursuant to Section 99314. Exchanges pursuant to this section shall be on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 16.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in allocating the funds available pursuant to Section 99313, the transportation planning agencies and county transportation commissions, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board give priority consideration to offsetting reductions in federal operating assistance and the unanticipated increase in the cost of fuel, to enhancing existing public transportation services, and to meeting high-priority regional, countywide, or areawide public transportation needs.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or limit the ability of, a public transit operator to do the following:

(1) Contract
 with common carriers of persons operating under a franchise or license.

(2) Employ part-time drivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 17.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e) and Section 99314.7, the following eligibility standards apply:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), funds shall be allocated for operating or capital purposes pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314 to an operator if the operator meets either of the following efficiency standards:

(A) The operator shall receive its entire allocation, and any or all of this allocation may be used for operating purposes, if the operator’s total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour in the latest year for which audited data are available does not exceed the sum of the preceding year’s total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour and an amount equal to the product of the
 percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for the same period multiplied by the preceding year’s total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour.

(B) The operator shall receive its entire allocation, and any or all of this allocation may be used for operating purposes, if the operator’s average total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour in the latest three years for which audited data are available does not exceed the sum of the average of the total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour in the three years preceding the latest year for which audited data are available and an amount equal to the product of the average percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for the same period multiplied by the average total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour in the same three years.

(2) If an operator does not meet either efficiency standard under paragraph (1), the operator shall
 receive its entire allocation and the funds shall be allocated pursuant to this paragraph. The portion of the allocation that the operator may use for operations shall be the total allocation to the operator reduced by the lowest percentage by which the operator’s total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour for the applicable year or three-year period calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) exceeded the target amount necessary to meet the applicable efficiency standard. The remaining portion of the operator’s allocation shall be used only for capital purposes.

(3) The transportation planning agency or county transportation commission, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, as the case may be, shall adjust the calculation of operating costs and revenue vehicle hours pursuant to paragraph (1) to account for either or both of the following factors:

(A) Exclusion of cost increases beyond the change in the Consumer Price Index for fuel; alternative fuel programs; power, including electricity; insurance premiums and payments in settlement of claims arising out of the operator’s liability; or state or federal mandates.

(B) Exclusion of the costs and revenue vehicle hours required to provide comparable complementary paratransit service as required by Section 37.121 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, pursuant to the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec 12101 et seq.), as identified in the operator’s paratransit plan pursuant to Section 37.139 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, costs and revenue vehicle hours required to operate demand response and microtransit services that expand access to transit service beyond fixed route corridors, costs of funding or improving payment and ticketing systems and services, costs of security
 services and public safety contracts, any expense greater than the actuarially determined contribution associated with pensions and other post-employment benefits as required by Government Accounting Standards Board Statement Numbers 68 and 75, costs of planning for improvements in transit operations, integration with other operators and agencies, transitioning to zero-emission operations, and for compliance with state and federal mandates, and startup costs for new services for a period of not more than two years.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Consumer Price Index,” as applied to an operator, is the regional Consumer Price Index for that operator’s region, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. If a regional index is not published, the index for the State of California applies.

(2) “Microtransit” means IT-enabled multipassenger transportation services that serve passengers using dynamically generated routes, and may expect passengers to make their way to and from common pick-up or drop-off points. Microtransit vehicles include, but are not limited to, large sport utility vehicles, vans, and shuttle buses.

(3) “New service” has the same meaning as “extension of public transportation services” as defined in Section 99268.8.

(4) “Operating cost” means the total operating cost as reported by the operator under the uniform system of accounts and records, pursuant to Section 99243 and subdivision (a) of Section 99247.

(5) “Revenue vehicle hours” has the same meaning as “vehicle service hours,” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section
 99247.

(c) The restrictions in this section do not apply to allocations made for capital purposes.

(d) The exclusion of cost increases described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) applies solely for the purpose of calculating an operator’s eligibility to claim funds pursuant to this section and does not authorize an operator to report an operating cost per revenue vehicle hour, other than as described in this section and in Section 99247, to any of the following entities:

(1) The Controller pursuant to Section 99243.

(2) The entity conducting the fiscal audit pursuant to Section 99245.

(3) The entity conducting the performance audit pursuant to Section 99246.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an operator is exempt from meeting either efficiency standard under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for the 2020–21 to 2026–27, inclusive, fiscal years, and may use the funds allocated pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314 for operating or capital purposes during that period of time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 4.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.7.

(a) In allocating funds for operating purposes pursuant to Sections 99313 and 99314, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall apply the following eligibility standards to the operators within the region subject to its jurisdiction:

(1) An operator is not eligible for its full allocation under this section unless the operator has been found to have made reasonable effort in implementing productivity improvements pursuant to Section 99244. In determining whether a
 reasonable effort has been made, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall give consideration to whether the operator would qualify for funding under Section 99314.6. The amount of funds allocated shall be reduced in an amount that the Metropolitan Transportation Commission deems proportionate to the failure of the operator to implement the recommended improvements. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall adopt rules and regulations, in cooperation with the affected operators, governing the allocation of any funds withheld under this paragraph, subject to paragraphs (2) and (3). 

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an operator shall not receive any funds pursuant to Section 99313 or 99314 unless it has complied with the applicable rules , regulations, and recommendations adopted by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission pursuant to Sections 66516 and 66516.5 of the Government Code.

(3) Funds withheld from allocation to an operator pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be retained by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission for reallocation to that operator for two years following the year of ineligibility. With respect to the funds withheld from an operator pursuant to paragraph (1), the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall reallocate those funds to the operator if the operator complies with that paragraph within two years. Funds not reallocated to the operator, and funds withheld pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be allocated to any eligible operator within the region subject to the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission for the purpose of improving coordination among the operators, or to any operator whose increase in total operating cost per revenue vehicle hour is less than the increase in the Consumer Price Index. Funds allocated for these purposes are exempt from subdivision (a).

(b) For purposes of this section, “operating cost,” “revenue vehicle hour,” and “Consumer Price Index” have the same meaning as defined in Section 99314.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 256, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the third and fourth quarters of the 2015–16 fiscal year, and for all four quarters of the 2016–17 fiscal year, the Controller shall calculate and publish the allocation of all funds made pursuant to Section 99314 to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the member agencies of the Altamont Commuter Express Authority, and the member agencies of the Southern California Regional Rail Authority based on the same list of operators and the same individual operator ratios published by the Controller in its original Fourth Quarter State Transit Assistance Allocation transmittal memo for the 2014–15 fiscal year, unless the Controller has subsequently published revisions or adjustments to its original Fourth
 Quarter State Transit Assistance Allocation transmittal memo for the 2014–15 fiscal year, in which case the revised or adjusted list of operators and individual operator ratios shall be used.

(b) Each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board may apply the individual operator ratios calculated for the third quarter of the 2015–16 fiscal year pursuant to this section to any undistributed funds remaining from the first and second quarters of the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(c) Upon allocation of funds pursuant to this section to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the member agencies of the Altamont Commuter Express Authority, and the member agencies of the Southern California Rail Authority, the Controller shall
 publish the amount of funding applicable to each operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 86, Sec. 19.   (AB 1113)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.9.

Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, for the estimates described in Section 99312.7, the Controller shall publish the allocations for each eligible recipient agency, including one list applicable to revenues allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99312.1 and another list for revenues allocated from all other revenues in the Public Transportation Account that are designated for the State Transit Assistance Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 10.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2020–21 to 2025–26, inclusive, fiscal years, the Controller shall calculate and publish the allocation of funds made pursuant to Section 99314 to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the member agencies of the Altamont Commuter Express Authority, and the member agencies of the Southern California Regional Rail Authority based on the same individual operator ratios published by the Controller in its August 2020 State Transit Assistance Allocation transmittal memo, or as the Controller may subsequently revise that memo before June 30, 2026, to account for an STA-eligible operator’s termination of transit operations during those fiscal years or for a new STA-eligible operator, as described in
 subdivision (c) of Section 99314, during those fiscal years.

(b) In calculating the individual operator ratios for the August 2020 State Transit Assistance Allocation transmittal memo described in subdivision (a), the Controller shall use the data from the most recent annual report submitted by each STA-eligible operator to the Controller pursuant to Section 99243, except that the Controller shall not use data from a fiscal year before the 2017–18 fiscal year. For a subsequent revision to the memo, as described in subdivision (a), the Controller shall incorporate the data from the most recent annual report submitted by a new STA-eligible operator pursuant to Section 99243 into the data used in the memo for existing STA-eligible operators.

(c) Upon allocation of funds pursuant to this section to each transportation planning agency and county transportation commission, the San Diego
 Metropolitan Transit Development Board, the member agencies of the Altamont Commuter Express Authority, and the member agencies of the Southern California Regional Rail Authority, the Controller shall publish the amount of funding allocated to each operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 54, Sec. 10.   (SB 125)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

99314.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as specified in subdivision (b), Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 do not apply to an operator for a fiscal year in which the operator expended from local funding an amount for transit operations not less than the amount the operator expended from local funding for transit operations during the 2018–19 fiscal year. As used in this subdivision, “local funding” means any nonstate grant funds or other revenues generated by, earned by, or distributed to, an operator.

(b) (1) For purposes of verifying the expenditures described in subdivision (a), the Controller may request fiscal data from the operator or conduct an audit of the operator.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the operator fails to comply with the Controller’s request for fiscal data within 120 days of receiving the request, as determined by the Controller, Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 apply to the operator.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the Controller, through an audit of the operator, determines that the operator did not meet the requirements of subdivision (a), Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 apply to the operator.

(4) An operator to which Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 apply pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) shall reimburse the state for any funds spent unlawfully.

(c) The Controller shall not require an operator to which Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 do not apply pursuant to subdivision (a) to report data submitted or
 collected only for purposes of complying with those sections.

(d) (1) On or before November 30, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the revenue vehicle hours, ridership, and passenger mile impacts on the services offered by operators to which Sections 99314.6 and 99314.7 do not apply pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 13.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

99315.

Funds made available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99312 shall be available for all of the following purposes:

(a) To the department for bus and passenger rail services pursuant to Sections 14035, 14035.5, and 14038 of the Government Code.

(b) To the department for funding of public
 transit capital improvement projects in the state transportation improvement program, pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code.

(c) To the department for its planning activities not payable from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund, its mass transportation responsibilities, and its assistance in regional transportation planning.

(d) To the department for allocation by the director to the Institute of Transportation Studies of the University of California for training and research in public transportation systems engineering and management and coordination with other transportation modes.

(e) To the commission for its activities not payable from the State Highway Account.

(f) To the Public Utilities Commission for its
 passenger rail safety responsibilities specified in statute on commuter rail, intercity rail, and urban rail transit lines.

(g) For transfer to the Transportation Debt Service Fund created by Section 16965 of the Government Code to reimburse the General Fund for current year debt service payments on rail and transit-related general obligation bonds other than those issued pursuant to the Clean Air and Transportation Improvement Act of 1990 (Part 11.5 (commencing with Section 99600)), as follows:

(1) For the 2009–10 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer up to one hundred forty-two million fifty-eight thousand dollars ($142,058,000) to the fund upon order of the Director of Finance for debt service paid or payable within that fiscal year.

(2) For the 2010–11 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer up to ninety
 million eight hundred eighty-six thousand dollars ($90,886,000) in revenues collected before November 2, 2010, to the fund, as follows:

(A) By the 15th of every month, the Treasurer, in consultation with the Director of Finance, shall notify the Controller of the amount of debt service that will be paid on each transportation bond during that month.

(B) Within two business days following the 28th of every month, the Controller shall transfer from the account to the Transportation Debt Service Fund an amount equal to monthly debt service paid by the General Fund on any bonds issued pursuant to Proposition 108 (1990) and Proposition 1A (2008), and one-quarter of the monthly debt service paid by the General Fund on any bonds issued pursuant to Proposition 1B (2006).

(C) Any transfers made from the Public Transportation
 Account pursuant to this subdivision for any months after October 2010 shall be reversed and repaid to the account, and shall instead be made, to the extent authorized, from weight fee revenues in the State Highway Account as provided for in Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 10.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

99315.7.

All funds from the Public Transportation Account and the State Highway Account, State Transportation Fund, previously allocated by the commission or the department to the new Fresno Amtrak Station project shall also be available for expenditure on any form of Amtrak project in the Fresno downtown area, including, but not limited to, the rehabilitation of the former Santa Fe Railway station, as approved by the commission or the department or the commission and the department. The encumbering and expending of funds for this project is not subject to an
 additional allocation action or approval action, or both actions, by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

99315.8.

All funds from the Public Transportation Account and the State Highway Account, in the State Transportation Fund, previously allocated by the commission for specific track repair and rolling stock acquisitions through resolutions number MFP-95-05, MFP-95-10, MPFP-95-01, MFA-96-01, and MBFA-98-01 shall also be available for expenditure on any form of track improvement project, track rehabilitation project, or rolling stock acquisition project nominated by the North Coast Railroad Authority, as approved by the commission. Projects nominated by the North Coast
 Railroad Authority, for which funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund are to be used, are also required to be eligible under Article XIX of the California Constitution. The encumbering and expending of funds for this project is not subject to an additional allocation action or approval action, or both actions, by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 860, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

99315.95.

All funds from the Public Transportation Account and the State Highway Account, in the State Transportation Fund, previously allocated by the California Transportation Commission to the City of Seaside for the acquisition of right-of-way for the Fort Ord rail station shall also be available for expenditure by the Transportation Agency for Monterey County for work at the Monterey Bay rail station. The commission shall oversee the timely use of these funds in accordance with the requirements specified in current law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 736, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

99316.

Funds made available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99315 shall be appropriated to the department for allocation, as directed by the commission, for purposes of bus and passenger rail services pursuant to Sections 14035, 14035.5, and 14038 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 105, Sec. 29.   Effective July 10, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

99317.

(a) Funds made available pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99315 shall be appropriated to the department for allocation, as directed by the commission, to fund public transit capital improvement projects that maintain or improve public transit service.

(b) Funds made available for capital outlay pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14031.6 of the Government Code and subdivision (a) of Section 99315 shall be appropriated to the department, as directed by the commission, solely for capital outlay improvements and rolling stock on intercity rail passenger routes. 

(c) The Legislature may amend this section, by statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, if the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 53, Sec. 11.   Effective June 1, 1998.   Note: This section was amended on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

99317.1.

(a) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99317 shall, in addition to the purposes specified in that section, be available for short-line railroad rehabilitation projects, through the state transportation improvement program.

(1) Projects eligible for funding pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to railroad rehabilitation projects.

(2) To be eligible for funding pursuant to this
 subdivision, a project proposal shall be submitted by a public entity. The public entity shall submit a project proposal only if it has made a finding, following a public hearing, that rail service on the affected railroad would be in imminent danger of being discontinued without the expenditure of public funds, and that continuation of the service serves a public purpose.

(b) As used in this section, “short-line railroad” means any standard gauge railroad which is being, or is planned to be, used for passenger service, other than a class I railroad, as that term is used and applied in federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99317.8.

(a) A public agency that has received an allocation for funding of an intermodal transfer station pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99317 shall provide for maintaining the station and its appurtenances, including, but not limited to, restroom facilities, in good condition and repair, and in accordance with high standards of cleanliness. As part of its duties in monitoring state-funded rail and bus services, the department shall, at least annually, conduct an unannounced inspection of each facility and make recommendations, if
 any, to the operating agency. Results of the department’s inspections shall be included in the passenger rail element of the State Rail Plan required pursuant to Section 14036 of the Government Code. If appropriate remedial action is not taken, the department may recommend to the commission that future applications for transit capital funding be denied.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that regular inspections of intermodal stations are necessary to protect the state’s capital investment in these essential transportation facilities and to avoid the problems resulting from deferred maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99317.9.

The department and the commission shall give reasonable priority to allocations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99317 to station projects that improve access for visitors to state prisons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99317.10.

(a) A public entity which has received an allocation for funding of an intermodal transfer station pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99317 shall, upon request of the department, authorize state-funded bus service to use the station without any charge to the department or its contractors, and shall assist the department in the placement of signs and informational material designed to alert the public to the availability of the state-funded bus service.

(b) A public
 entity shall not be eligible to receive an allocation for funding of an intermodal transfer station pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 99317 unless it first agrees that, upon any future request of the department, it will authorize a state-funded bus service to use the station without any charge to the department or its contractors and it will assist the department in the placement of signs and informational material designed to alert the public to the availability of the state-funded bus service.

(c) For the purpose of this section, “state-funded bus service” means any bus service funded pursuant to Section 99316.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99318.1.
